Massachusetts, session 194th, H4005.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. To provide for supplementing certain items in the general appropriations act 
and other appropriation acts for fiscal year 2025, the sums set forth in section 2 are hereby 
appropriated from the Education and Transportation Fund established in section 2BBBBBB of 
chapter 29 of the General Laws and the Education and Transportation Innovation and Capital 
Fund established in section 2DDDDDD of said chapter 29, unless specifically designated 
otherwise in this act or in those appropriation acts, for the several purposes and subject to the 
conditions specified in this section and subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public 
funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2025. All appropriations in this section shall not be 
subject to section 5D of chapter 29 of the General Laws. These sums shall be in addition to any 
amounts previously appropriated and made available for the purposes of those items.  

of 10 11   SECTION 2. 
TRANSPORTATION 
Massachusetts Department of Transportation 
1596-2404 MBTA Physical Infrastructure………………………………...$60,000,000 
1596-2405 MBTA Low-Income Fare Relief ..............................................$20,000,000 
1596-2427 MBTA Workforce/Safety Reserve .........................................$400,000,000 
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION 
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education 
1596-2422 Universal School Meals……………………………………..$10,000,000 
1596-2424 Green Schoolworks……………………………………………$10,000,000 
7061-0012  Special Education Circuit Breaker…………………………....$58,000,000 
Student Opportunity Act Investment Fund........................100% 
Department of Higher Education 
1596-2425 DHE Endowment Match………………………………………$10,000,000 
1596-2426 UMass Endowment Match…………………………………….$10,000,000 
SECTION 2A. The sums set forth in this section are hereby appropriated from the 
Education and Transportation Fund established in section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29 of the 
General Laws and the Education and Transportation Innovation and Capital Fund established in 

of 10 29 section 2DDDDDD of said chapter 29 for the purposes and subject to the conditions specified in 
this section and subject to the laws regulating the disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year 
ending June 30, 2025. All appropriations in this section shall not be subject to section 5D of 
chapter 29 of the General Laws. These sums shall be made available through the fiscal year 
ending June 30, 2028. 
EXECUTIVE OFFICE OF EDUCATION 
Office of the Secretary 
1596-2513 For a grant program for capital improvements, leasing of additional space 
and other initiatives necessary to build capacity and safely accommodate additional career 
technical education school slots; provided, that the funds shall be administered by the executive 
office of education, in consultation with the Massachusetts School Building Authority and the 
executive office of labor and workforce development; and provided further, that in determining a 
process for awarding grants, the executive office shall prioritize meeting the workforce demands 
of regional employers, reducing demonstrable waitlists at career and technical education schools 
and providing equitable access to career and technical skills training..........................$50,000,000 
1596-2517 For local one-time education projects…………………………….$100,000 
Department of Early Education and Care 
1596-2511 For initiatives to support workforce, affordability and quality 
improvements in the early education and care sector; provided, that funds may be transferred at 
the direction of the secretary of administration and finance to the Early Education and Care 
Operational Grant Fund established in section 19 of chapter 15D of the General Laws; provided 

of 10 50 further, that not less than $20,000,000 shall be expended for a reimbursement rate increase for 
subsidized early education center-based and family child care providers in the fiscal year ending 
on June 30, 2026; provided further, that notwithstanding any general or special law to the 
contrary, funds from said transfer may be expended from said fund for one-time improvements 
that assist all families in connecting to child care providers and other initiatives to support 
capacity building and workforce supports for early education and care 
providers........................................................................................................................$40,000,000 
Department of Elementary and Secondary Education 
1596-2514 For educational grants to reduce the waitlist for English for speakers of 
other languages services; provided, that funds shall be administered by the department of 
elementary and secondary education in coordination with the Workforce Skills Cabinet 
established in Executive Order No. 560, dated February 26, 2015; provided further, that in 
determining a process for awarding grants, the department shall prioritize programs focused on 
training workers with the English language skills needed to fill in-demand jobs; and provided 
further, that the commissioner of elementary and secondary education may transfer funds to item 
7035-0002 and expend said funds subject to the conditions specified in said item in the general 
appropriations act for the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2026.......................................$8,500,000 
1596-2515 For an early literacy high-dosage tutoring initiative program directed by 
the commissioner of elementary and secondary education; provided, that said program shall 
support Massachusetts public schools and districts to partner with providers approved by the 
department of elementary and secondary education to address pandemic-related learning loss and 
other identified underperformance to support accelerated literacy growth for students in 

of 10 72 kindergarten through grade 3; provided further, that students characterized as below benchmark 
in grade 1 shall be prioritized; provided further, that funds may support activities, including, but 
not limited to: (i) providing early literacy tutoring services for students in kindergarten through 
grade 3 who have not met relevant benchmarks on department of elementary and secondary 
education-approved early literacy screening assessments; (ii) administering said screening 
assessments for participating students and collecting and sharing pre- and post-tutoring data; (iii) 
studying the impact of the provided tutoring; and (iv) providing in-person or virtual foundational 
skills-focused tutoring services per department of elementary and secondary education guidance; 
and provided further, that participating entities may include, but shall not be limited to: (a) public 
schools; and (b) districts serving a large proportion of high-needs students………….$25,000,000 
1596-2516 For a reserve to support reimbursements to school districts and direct 
payments to service providers for special education instructional and transportation costs 
pursuant to section 5A of chapter 71B of the General Laws and item 7061-0012; provided, that 
reimbursements shall be made in the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2026 for costs incurred in the 
fiscal year ending on June 30, 2025; provided further, that funds may be transferred to said item 
7061-0012 and expended subject to the conditions specified in said item in the general 
appropriations act for the fiscal year ending on June 30, 2026; provided further, that not less than 
$250,000 shall be expended for the office of the inspector general to review school district 
transportation service practices provided pursuant to said section 5A of said chapter 71B, 
including, but not limited to, procurement of said services, and to make recommendations for 
school districts that aim to reduce costs and ensure that districts maximize purchasing power and 
act transparently and efficiently to provide said services; provided further, that the office of the 
inspector general shall review possible ways for districts to consolidate transportation services 

of 10 95 regionally, to the extent practicable; provided further, that not later than February 2, 2026, the 
office of the inspector general shall submit to the house and senate committees on ways and 
means and the joint committee on education and publish on its website recommendations and 
best practices: (i) for school districts to reduce costs and maximize purchasing power for 
transportation services; (ii) to consolidate transportation services regionally, to the extent 
100 practicable; and (iii) that the office deems necessary for said services; provided further, that the 
101 office of the inspector general shall include in its recommendations any information on cost 
102 savings for school districts by following said best practices and recommendations; and provided 
103 further, that the department of elementary and secondary education shall provide any information 
104 necessary for the office of the inspector general to conduct a comprehensive review under this 
105 item…………………………………………………………………..........................$190,000,000 
106  1596-2518 For a capital project, including development costs, administered by the 
107 department of elementary and secondary education for the Holocaust Legacy Foundation, Inc. to 
108 establish the Boston Holocaust Museum to provide interactive educational opportunities in the 
109 commonwealth, including, but not limited to, history and social science frameworks; provided, 
110 that funds may be used for: (i) exhibit buildout; (ii) accessibility; (iii) security infrastructure; (iv) 
111 educational technology; and (v) curriculum………………………$5,000,000 
112 TRANSPORTATION 
113 Massachusetts Department of Transportation 
114  1595-2508 For an operating transfer to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation 
115 Authority to replenish the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority deficiency fund; 
116 provided, that the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority shall notify the Massachusetts 

of 10 117 Department of Transportation, the executive office for administration and finance, the house and 
118 senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on transportation not less than 30 
119 days prior to withdrawing funds from the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority 
120 deficiency fund; and provided further, that not later than June 30, 2025, the Massachusetts Bay 
121 Transportation Authority shall submit a written deficiency fund policy to the Massachusetts 
122 Department of Transportation, the executive office for administration and finance, the joint 
123 committee on transportation and the house and senate committees on ways and 
124 means………………………………………………………………………………$300,000,000 
125  1596-2505 For an operating transfer to the Massachusetts Transportation Trust Fund 
126 established in section 4 of chapter 6C of the General Laws for a program to support grants for 
127 workforce and training initiatives at regional transit authorities and support transit improvements 
128 across the commonwealth; provided, that the Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall 
129 oversee the distribution of grants under this item; and provided further, that not later than March 
130 2, 2026, the department shall submit a report to the joint committee on transportation and the 
131 house and senate committees on ways and means that shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the 
132 grant criteria used to determine awards; (ii) a list of grant recipients, including the amounts 
133 received by each recipient; and (iii) a description of the specific uses by each  
134 recipient ...................................................................................................................$25,000,000 
135  1596-2506 For an operating transfer to the Massachusetts Transportation Trust Fund 
136 established in section 4 of chapter 6C of the General Laws for a pilot program to provide grants 
137 to municipalities for repair, maintenance and improvements to unpaved roads; provided, that the 
138 Massachusetts Department of Transportation shall oversee the distribution of grants under this 

of 10 139 item; provided further, that said grant funds shall only be available to municipalities for repair, 
140 maintenance and improvements to dirt or gravel roads that are open to the public and maintained 
141 by the municipality; provided further, that grant funds shall be used by municipalities for: (i) 
142 reconstruction, surface grading, crown and shoulder restoration and removal of wash boarding 
143 and potholes; (ii) guardrail and signage repair or replacement; (iii) drainage work, including 
144 swales; and (iv) the purchase or lease of maintenance equipment, including, but not limited to, 
145 graders, rollers and loaders; provided further, that municipalities shall not use grant funds for: (a) 
146 construction of new roadways; (b) conversion of unpaved roads to paved roads; (c) landscaping 
147 or removing vegetation not related to an eligible use project; (d) culverts; (e) retaining walls; or 
148 (f) police details; and provided further, that not later than December 30, 2025, the Massachusetts 
149 Department of Transportation shall submit a report on grant funds from this item to the house 
150 and senate committees on ways and means and the joint committee on transportation that shall 
151 include, but shall not be limited to: (A) the methodology used to distribute grant funds; (B) a list 
152 of all municipalities that received grant funds; and (C) the amount of grant funds awarded to 
153 each municipality…………………………………………………………………...…$10,000,000 
154  1596-2507 For local one-time transportation projects………………………..$100,000 
155  1596-2509 For an operating transfer to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation 
156 Authority under clause (1) of subsection (d) of section 2ZZZ of chapter 29 of the General Laws 
157 for direct costs and lost revenues attributable to initiatives undertaken by the Massachusetts Bay 
158 Transportation Authority to mitigate traffic impacts related to the closure of the Sumner Tunnel 
159 during fiscal years 2024 and 2025; provided, that the Massachusetts Bay Transportation 
160 Authority shall submit a report to the Massachusetts Department of Transportation, the joint 
161 committee on transportation and the house and senate committees on ways and means detailing 

of 10 162 the initiatives undertaken by the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority to mitigate traffic 
163 impacts related to the closure of the Sumner Tunnel for maintenance .........................$13,000,000 
164  SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, income surtax 
165 revenue, as defined in section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29 of the General Laws, collected in the 
166 fiscal year ending on June 30, 2024 but certified after July 20, 2024, shall be transferred to the 
167 Education and Transportation Innovation and Capital Fund established in section 2DDDDDD of 
168 said chapter 29 from the Student Opportunity Act Investment Fund established in section 35RRR 
169 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, not later than 30 days after the effective date of this act. 
170  SECTION 4. Section 2F of chapter 140 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by striking 
171 out item 1596-2427 and inserting in place thereof the following item:- 
172  1596-2427 For a transfer to the Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority 
173 workforce and safety reserve established in line item 1599-1971 of section 2 of chapter 126 of 
174 the acts of 2022, for projects to address ongoing safety concerns at the Massachusetts Bay 
175 Transportation Authority related to the interim and final findings of the Federal Transit 
176 Administration’s Safety Management Inspection initiated in April 2022; provided, that the 
177 Massachusetts Bay Transportation Authority shall work in consultation with the Massachusetts 
178 Department of Transportation and the department of public utilities in the planning and 
179 implementation of said projects funded through this item; provided further, that funds may be 
180 expended for hiring and retention related to said projects; provided further, that funds may be 
181 expended to support ongoing costs associated with said projects which shall include preventative 
182 maintenance, safety, service delivery and capital activities necessary to remain in compliance 
183 with said findings of said inspection; provided further, that the Massachusetts Department of 

of 10 184 Transportation shall issue monthly reports to the joint committee on transportation and the house 
185 and senate committees on ways and means detailing the status of the Massachusetts Bay 
186 Transportation Authority’s progress toward responding to each finding and required action as 
187 issued by the Federal Transit Administration; and provided further, that said reports shall be 
188 delineated by special directive and shall include, but shall not be limited to: (i) the funds 
189 expended from this item and the related purpose for said spending; (ii) the completion date of 
190 each executed required action; and (iii) the estimated completion date of each pending required 
191 action..............................................................................................................................$36,000,000 
192  Education and Transportation Fund ....................... 100%